src/particle-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ############################### !
!This file contains the Particles !
! ############################### !


! Particles
! =========


LEXICON Particles
abai pcle ;
ahteson pcle ;
aitto pcle ;
almma pcle ;
ama pcle ;
goitto+Use/LexSub:gojtto pcle ;
amal pcle ;
amat pcle ;
!ládje pcle ;
!láhkai pcle ;
!ládjii pcle ;
amma pcle ;
ammahal pcle ;
ammahan:ammahan9 pcle ;
ammal pcle ;
ammat pcle ;
ammes pcle ;
appason pcle ;
ba pcle ;
ban:ban9 pcle ;
bat pcle ;
!be pcle ; only in Finland as clitic?
dat pcle ;
eaigga pcle ;
eiddo pcle ;
eigga pcle ;
eitto pcle ;
galahal pcle ;
galahan pcle ;
galhal pcle ;
ge pcle ;
gen pcle ;
ges pcle ;
gis pcle ;
go qpcle ;
goit:gojt pcle ;
goittot:gojttot pcle ;
goittot+Use/Sub:gojtot pcle ;
goittotge:gojttotge pcle ;
! got pcle ;
hás pcle ;
hal pcle ;
han pcle ;
han+Use/Sub:hon pcle ;
mat pcle ; ! boađe mat deike = tules tänne
na pcle ;
nai:naj pcle ;
no pcle ;
noa pcle ;
son pcle ;

LEXICON pcle
+Pcle: # ;

LEXICON qpcle
+Pcle+Qst: # ;
! Perhaps this should be opened to  a direction to K
! and all the ge versions should be removed.
! (i.e. only goit, not goitge). This errouneously
! permits gege, goge, etc., though, and we thus leave
! things as they are.
